Tennessee, session 114, SB1737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) It is an offense for a person to knowingly travel, with intent to commit theft of
another person's cash, from a commercial business or a financial institution, as defined
in § 45-11-102, on the same path or route as another person without substantial
deviation from that path or route while in possession of two (2) or more criminal
instruments.
(b)
(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(3), a violation of
subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class D felony if, during the
commission of the offense, the person commits a violation of title 39, chapter 13,
part 10.
(3) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class B felony if, during the
commission of the offense, the person commits a violation of title 39, chapter 13,
part 4.
(c) As used in this section, "criminal instrument" means an item or thing, the
possession of which is not otherwise an offense, that is possessed, used, made,
designed, or adapted for use in the commission of an offense under title 39, chapter 13,
part 10 or § 39-14-103.
SB1737
008929
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 008929